Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6527
Additional definitions.

Any term defined in the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 has the same meaning in the Defense Efforts Workforce Act unless the context or the express language of the Defense Efforts Workforce Act requires a different meaning.

Laws 2025, LB649, § 4.
July 1, 2027
Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, see section 77-2701.